Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201844-9009
Own risk and solvency assessment
summary report; documentation and supporting information.

(1) An own risk and
solvency assessment summary report shall be prepared consistent with the own
risk and solvency assessment guidance manual, subject to the requirements
of subsection (2) of this section. Documentation and supporting information
shall be maintained and made available upon examination or upon request of
the director.

(2) The review
of the own risk and solvency assessment summary report, and any additional
requests for information, shall be made using similar procedures currently
used in the analysis and examination of multistate or global insurers and
insurance groups.

Laws 2014, LB700, § 9.